src/fst/phonology.twolc
Alphabet

A B C Ĉ D E F G Ĝ H Ĥ I J Ĵ K L M N O P R S Ŝ T U Ŭ V Z
a b c ĉ d e f g ĝ h Ĥ i j ĵ k l m n o p r s ŝ t u ŭ v z

!%{S%}:s  ! archiphoneme
!%>:0

;

Rules

! "Turn {S} into s"
! %{S%}:s <=> _ ;

!"y:i before inflectional s"
!y:i <=> _ (0:e) %>:0 %{S%}:s .#. ;

!"0:e after y:i before inflectional s"
!0:e <=> y:i _ %>:0 %{S%}:s .#. ;
